Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,105
Foreign country.

The law of a jurisdiction other than those referred to in section 25-12,101 shall be an issue for the court, but shall not be subject to the foregoing provisions concerning judicial notice.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 5, p. 273.

Laws of a jurisdiction other than state or territory of the United States must be both pleaded and proved. Scott v. Scott, 153 Neb. 906, 46 N.W.2d 627 (1951).